District of Columbia statutes.
16-3542

Notice to defendant.

On the issuing of a writ of quo warranto the court may fix a time within which the defendant may appear and answer the writ. When the defendant cannot be found in the District of Columbia, the court may direct notice to be given to him by publication as in other cases of proceedings against nonresident defendants, and upon proof of publication, if the defendant does not appear, judgment may be rendered as if he had been personally served.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 602, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)
1981 Ed., § 16-3542.
1973 Ed., § 16-3542.